North Dakota statutes. TITLE 39 Motor Vehicles
CHAPTER 39-06.1 Disposition of Traffic Offenses

39-06.1-01.
Definitions.

As used in this title:

“Adjudication” and “admission” means an official determination, in the manner provided by law, that a traffic violation has been committed by a named driver.

“Equivalent ordinance” means an ordinance of a city, state, or other jurisdiction which is comparable to the cited statute and defines essentially the same offense, even if the language of the ordinance differs or procedural points or methods of proof differ.

“Official” means a municipal judge or a magistrate or other qualified individual appointed by the presiding judge of the judicial district to serve for all or part of the judicial district.

“Points” means the number of demerits assigned to particular types of traffic violations.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 301, § 1; 1975, ch. 339, § 7; 1997, ch. 332, § 7; 2013, ch. 295, § 2.

39-06.1-02.
Traffic violations noncriminal — Exceptions — Procedures.

An individual cited, in accordance with sections 39-07-07 and 39-07-08, for a traffic violation under state law or municipal ordinance, other than an offense listed in section 39-06.1-05, is deemed to be charged with a noncriminal offense.

The individual may appear before the designated official and pay the statutory fee for the violation charged at or before the time scheduled for a hearing.

If the individual has posted bond, the individual may forfeit bond by not appearing at the designated time.

If the individual is cited for a traffic violation under state law and posts bond by mail, the bond must be submitted within fourteen days of the date of the citation and the individual cited shall indicate on the citation whether a hearing is requested. If the individual does not request a hearing within fourteen days of the date of the citation, the bond is deemed forfeited and the violation admitted. If the individual requests a hearing, the court for the county in which the citation is issued shall issue a summons to the individual requesting the hearing notifying the individual of the date of the hearing before the designated official in accordance with section 39-06.1-03.

Upon appearing at the hearing scheduled in the citation or otherwise scheduled at the individual’s request, the individual may make a statement in explanation of the individual’s action. The official may at that time waive, reduce, or suspend the statutory fee or bond, or both. If the individual cited follows the foregoing procedures, the individual is deemed to have admitted the violation and to have waived the right to a hearing on the issue of commission of the violation.

The bond required to secure appearance must be identical to the statutory fee established by section 39-06.1-06.

Within ten days after forfeiture of bond or payment of the statutory fee, the official having jurisdiction over the violation shall certify to the director:

Admission of the violation; and

In speeding violations, whether the speed charged was in excess of the lawful speed limit by more than nine miles [14.48 kilometers] per hour and the miles [kilometers] per hour by which the speed limit was exceeded.

Under this section a citing police officer may not receive the statutory fee or bond.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 301, § 2; 1975, ch. 339, § 8; 1981, ch. 388, § 1; 1995, ch. 318, § 2; 2013, ch. 295, § 3; 2021, ch. 291, § 1, effective August 1, 2021.

Cross-References.

Motorcycles, provisions of this chapter apply to, see § 39-10.2-07.

39-06.1-02.1.
Notification of parents or guardians of juvenile traffic offenders.

The clerk of court shall notify the parent or guardian of any juvenile appearing before the court on a traffic offense of the charge as contained in the citation, the penalty attached to the offense, and the time and place of any court hearing on the matter.

Source:

S.L. 1977, ch. 351, § 1.

39-06.1-03.
Administrative hearing — Procedures — Appeals — Stay orders.

An individual cited for a traffic violation, other than an offense listed in section 39-06.1-05, who does not follow one of the procedures in section 39-06.1-02, may request a hearing on the issue of commission of the charged violation. The hearing must be held at the time scheduled in the citation, at the time scheduled in response to the individual’s request, or at some future time, not to exceed ninety days later, set at that first appearance.

At the time of a request for a hearing on the issue of commission of the violation, the individual charged shall deposit with the official having jurisdiction an appearance bond equal to the statutory fee for the charged violation.

If an individual cited for a traffic violation, other than an offense listed in section 39-06.1-05, has requested a hearing on the issue of the commission of the charged violation and appears at the time scheduled for the hearing, and the prosecution does not appear or is not ready to prove the commission of a charged violation at the hearing, the official shall dismiss the charge.

If the official finds that the individual had committed the traffic violation, the official shall notify the director of that fact, and whether the individual was driving more than nine miles [14.48 kilometers] per hour in excess of the lawful limit, stating specifically the miles [kilometers] per hour in excess of the lawful limit, if charged with a speeding violation, within ten days of the date of the hearing. The fact that an individual has admitted a violation, or has, in any proceeding, been found to have committed a violation, may not be referred to in any way, nor be admissible as evidence in any court, civil, equity, or criminal, except in an action or proceeding involving that individual’s operator’s license.

An individual may not appeal a finding from a district judge or magistrate that the individual committed the violation. If an individual is aggrieved by a finding in the municipal court that the individual committed the violation, the individual may, without payment of a filing fee, appeal that finding to the district court for trial anew. If, after trial in the appellate court, the individual is again found to have committed the violation, there is no further appeal. Notice of appeal under this subsection must be given within thirty days after a finding of commission of a violation is entered by the official. Oral notice of appeal may be given to the official at the time that the official adjudges that a violation has been committed. Otherwise, notice of appeal must be in writing and filed with the official, and a copy of the notice must be served upon the prosecuting attorney. An appeal taken under this subsection may not operate to stay the reporting requirement of subsection 4, nor to stay appropriate action by the director upon receipt of that report.

The appellate court upon application by the appellant may:

Order a stay of any action by the director during pendency of the appeal, but not to exceed a period of one hundred twenty days;

Order a stay and that the appellant be issued a temporary restricted driving certificate by the director to be effective for no more than one hundred twenty days; or

Deny the application.

If the individual charged is found not to have committed the violation by the appellate court, the clerk of court shall report that fact to the director immediately. Unless the appropriate state’s attorney consents to prosecute the appeal, if an appeal under this subsection is from a violation of a city ordinance, the city attorney for the city wherein the alleged violation occurred shall prosecute the appeal. In all other cases, the appropriate state’s attorney shall prosecute the appeal.

The state or the city, as appropriate, must prove the commission of a charged violation at the hearing or appeal under this section by a preponderance of the evidence. Upon an appeal under subsection 5, the court and parties shall follow, to the extent applicable, the North Dakota Rules of Civil Procedure. If on the appeal from the finding of the official the finding is affirmed, costs may be assessed at the discretion of the trial judge.

An application for a stay or temporary certificate under this subdivision must be accompanied by a certified copy of the appellant’s driving record, for the furnishing of which the director may charge a fee of three dollars. Any order granting a stay or a temporary certificate must be immediately forwarded by the clerk of court to the director, who immediately shall issue a temporary certificate in accordance with the order in the manner provided by law. A court may not make a determination on an application under this subdivision without notice to the appropriate prosecuting attorney. An individual who violates or exceeds the restrictions contained in any temporary restricted driving certificate issued under this subdivision is guilty of a traffic violation and must be assessed a fee of twenty dollars.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 301, § 3; 1975, ch. 339, § 9; 1977, ch. 352, § 1; 1979, ch. 417, § 1; 1981, ch. 320, § 94; 1983, ch. 431, § 1; 1991, ch. 326, § 151; 1995, ch. 318, § 3; 1995, ch. 375, § 1; 2003, ch. 312, § 3; 2009, ch. 279, § 4; 2013, ch. 295, § 4.

Note.

Administrative Rule 16 adopted by the supreme court on December 22, 1982, effective January 1, 1983, provides that all appeals pursuant to section 40-18-19 and N.D.R.Crim.P. 37, from determinations of municipal courts shall be filed and heard in the county court of that county.

The case of State v. Silkman, 317 N.W.2d 124 (1982), annotated below, was decided prior to the 1983 amendment to this section, which substituted “appeal that finding to the district court or county court for trial anew” for “appeal that finding to the district court for trial anew, and the case may be tried to a jury, if requested” at the end of the first sentence of subdivision 5(a).

39-06.1-04.
Failure to appear, pay statutory fee, post bond — Procedure — Penalty.

If an individual fails to choose one of the methods of proceeding in section 39-06.1-02 or 39-06.1-03, the individual is deemed to have admitted to commission of the charged violation, and the official having jurisdiction shall report the admission to the director within ten days after the date set for the hearing. Failure to appear at the time designated, after signing a promise to appear, if signing is required by law, or failure to appear without paying the statutory fee or posting and forfeiting bond is a class B misdemeanor. Failure to appear without just cause at the hearing is deemed an admission of commission of the charged violation.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 301, § 4; 1975, ch. 339, § 10; 2001, ch. 340, § 6; 2013, ch. 295, § 5.

39-06.1-05.
Offenses excepted.

The procedures authorized under sections 39-06.1-02 and 39-06.1-03 may not be utilized by a person charged with one of the following offenses:

Driving or being in actual physical control of a vehicle in violation of section 39-08-01, or an equivalent ordinance.

Reckless driving or aggravated reckless driving in violation of section 39-08-03, or an equivalent ordinance.

A violation of chapter 12.1-16 resulting from the operation of a motor vehicle.

Leaving the scene of an accident in violation of section 39-08-04, 39-08-05, 39-08-07, or 39-08-08, or equivalent ordinances.

Driving while license or driving privilege is suspended or revoked in violation of section 39-06-42, or an equivalent ordinance.

Violating subdivision b or c of subsection 5 of section 39-24-09.

Operating an unsafe vehicle in violation of subsection 2 of section 39-21-46.

Causing an accident with an authorized emergency vehicle or a vehicle operated by or under the control of the director used for maintaining the state highway system in violation of subsection 5 of section 39-10-26.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 301, § 5; 1975, ch. 339, §§ 11, 12; 1977, ch. 354, § 4; 1983, ch. 415, § 13; 1985, ch. 430, § 1; 1985, ch. 431, § 1; 1987, ch. 460, § 2; 1989, ch. 463, § 1; 2001, ch. 341, § 1; 2003, ch. 317, § 1; 2003, ch. 318, § 1; 2009, ch. 331, § 1; 2013, ch. 296, § 1; 2015, ch. 264, § 1, effective August 1, 2015.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 264, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

39-06.1-06.
Amount of statutory fees.

The fees required for a noncriminal disposition under section 39-06.1-02 or 39-06.1-03 must be as follows:

For a nonmoving violation as defined in section 39-06.1-08, a fee of twenty dollars except for a violation of any traffic parking regulation on any state charitable or penal institution property or on the state capitol grounds, a fee in the amount of five dollars, excluding a violation of subsection 11 of section 39-01-15.

For a moving violation as defined in section 39-06.1-09, a fee of twenty dollars, except for:

A violation of section 39-10-26, 39-10-26.2, 39-10-41, or 39-10-42, a fee of fifty dollars.

A violation of section 39-10-05 involving failure to yield to a pedestrian or subsection 1 of section 39-10-28, a fee of fifty dollars.

A violation of section 39-21-41.2, a fee of twenty-five dollars.

A violation of subsection 1 of section 39-12-02, section 39-08-23, or section 39-08-25, a fee of one hundred dollars.

A violation of subdivision d of subsection 1 of section 39-12-04, a fee of one hundred dollars.

A violation of subsection 6 of section 39-04-37, a fee of one hundred dollars.

A violation of subsection 2 of section 39-10-21.1, a fee of two hundred fifty dollars.

A violation of section 39-10-59, a fee of five hundred dollars.

A violation of section 39-09-01, a fee of thirty dollars.

A violation of section 39-09-01.1, a fee of thirty dollars.

A violation of section 39-10-46 or 39-10-46.1, a fee of one hundred dollars.

A violation of subsection 1 of section 39-08-20, one hundred fifty dollars for a first violation and three hundred dollars for a second or subsequent violation in three years.

A violation of section 39-10-24 or 39-10-44, a fee of forty dollars.

A violation of section 39-10-50.1, a fee of fifty dollars.

A violation of section 39-19-03, a fee of fifty dollars.

For a violation of section 39-21-44 or a rule adopted under that section, a fee of two hundred fifty dollars.

Except as provided in subsections 5 and 7, for a violation of section 39-09-02, or an equivalent ordinance, a fee established as follows:

On a highway on which the speed limit is a speed higher than fifty-five miles [88.51 kilometers] an hour, for a violation of section 39-09-02, or an equivalent ordinance, a fee established as follows:

For a violation of section 39-06.2-10.9 or subsection 3 of section 39-21-46, a fee established as follows:

Driving more than eleven hours since the last ten hours off duty, driving after fourteen hours on duty since the last ten hours off duty, driving after sixty hours on duty in seven days or seventy hours in eight days, no record of duty status or log book in possession, failing to retain previous seven-day record of duty status or log book, or operating a vehicle with four to six out-of-service defects, one hundred dollars;

False record of duty status or log book or operating a vehicle with seven to nine out-of-service defects, two hundred fifty dollars;

Operating a vehicle after driver placed out of service, operating a vehicle with ten or more out-of-service defects, or operating a vehicle that has been placed out of service prior to its repair, five hundred dollars; and

All other violations of motor carrier safety rules adopted under subsection 3 of section 39-21-46, fifty dollars.

On a highway on which the speed limit is posted in excess of sixty-five miles [104.61 kilometers] an hour, for a violation of section 39-09-02, or equivalent ordinance, a fee of five dollars for each mile per hour over the limit.

For a violation of a school zone speed limit under subdivision b of subsection 1 of section 39-09-02, a fee of forty dollars for one through ten miles per hour over the posted speed; and forty dollars, plus one dollar for each additional mile per hour over ten miles per hour over the limit unless a greater fee would be applicable under this section.

For a violation of a highway construction zone speed limit under subsection 2 of section 39-09-02, a fee of eighty dollars for one through ten miles per hour over the posted speed; and eighty dollars plus two dollars for each mile per hour over ten miles per hour over the limit, unless a greater fee would be applicable under this section. The fee in this subsection does not apply to a highway construction zone unless individuals engaged in construction are present at the time and place of the violation and the posted speed limit sign states “Minimum Fee $80”.

Miles per hour over lawful speed limit Fee 1 - 5 $ 5 6 - 10 $ 5 plus $1/each mph over 5 mph over limit 11 - 15 $ 10 plus $1/each mph over 10 mph over limit 16 - 20 $ 15 plus $2/each mph over 15 mph over limit 21 - 25 $ 25 plus $3/each mph over 20 mph over limit 26 - 35 $ 40 plus $3/each mph over 25 mph over limit 36 - 45 $ 70 plus $3/each mph over 35 mph over limit 46 + $100 plus $5/each mph over 45 mph over limit

Click to view

Miles per hour over lawful speed limit Fee 1 - 10 $2/each mph over limit 11 + $20 plus $5/each mph over 10 mph over limit

Click to view

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 301, § 6; 1979, ch. 418, § 1; 1979, ch. 419, § 1; 1981, ch. 379, § 3; 1981, ch. 389, § 1; 1981, ch. 391, § 1; 1983, ch. 432, § 1; 1985, ch. 430, § 4; 1987, ch. 463, §§ 1, 2; 1989, ch. 69, § 44; 1989, ch. 319, § 4; 1991, ch. 416, § 1; 1993, ch. 45, § 16; 1993, ch. 384, § 1; 1993, ch. 385, § 1; 1995, ch. 376, § 1; 1997, ch. 336, § 1; 1997, ch. 337, § 1; 1999, ch. 343, § 1; 1999, ch. 344, § 1; 2001, ch. 341, § 2; 2001, ch. 342, § 1; 2003, ch. 317, § 2; 2003, ch. 319, § 1; 2003, ch. 320, § 1; 2005, ch. 331, § 1; 2005, ch. 340, § 3; 2009, ch. 332, § 1; 2011, ch. 279, § 1; 2011, ch. 192, § 3; 2011, ch. 268, § 3; 2011, ch. 280, § 1; 2013, ch. 295, § 6; 2013, ch. 297, § 1; 2015, ch. 263, § 1; 2017, ch. 257, § 2, effective August 1, 2017; 2017, ch. 266, § 1, effective August 1, 2017; 2017, ch. 269, § 1, effective August 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 317, § 1, effective August 1, 2019; 2019, ch. 327, § 2, effective August 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 280, § 2, effective August 1, 2021; 2021, ch. 283, § 5, § 6, effective August 1, 2021.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 263, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

Note.

Section 39-06.1-06 was amended 3 times by the 2021 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 5 of Chapter 283, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 1502; Section 6 of Chapter 283, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 1502; and Section 2 of Chapter 280, Session Laws 2021, Senate Bill 2097.

Section 39-06.1-06 was amended 2 times by the 2019 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to

Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 2 of Chapter 327, Session Laws 2019, House Bill 1405; and Section 1 of Chapter 317, Session Laws 2019, House Bill 1327.

Section 39-06.1-06 was amended 3 times by the 2017 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to

Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 1 of Chapter 266, Session Laws 2017, House Bill 1311; Section 2 of Chapter 257, Session Laws 2017 House Bill 1211; and Section 1 of Chapter 269, Session Laws 2017, House Bill 1430.

This section is set out above to reflect a correction from the state since the 2015 cumulative supplement. In subsection (4) references to subsections (7) and (11) were changed to (5) and (7).

Chapter 385, S.L. 1993, which amended this section, was referred and approved on June 14, 1994, at the primary election, and became effective July 14, 1994, under N.D. Const., Art. III, § 8.

The 1989 amendment of this section by S.L. 1989, ch. 464, section 1 was disapproved by R.M. December 5, 1989.

S.L. 1987, ch. 463, § 7 provided that the act would be effective on the date the governor certified to the secretary of state and to the highway commissioner that the federal restrictions on speed limits exceeding fifty-five miles per hour are no longer in effect, but only if that day was before July 1, 1989. The governor issued such certification on April 7, 1987.

39-06.1-07.
Notification to offenders — Duties of director.

The director shall prepare notification forms to be delivered to the charged individual with the uniform traffic summons and complaint under section 29-05-31. The notification form may be delivered to the individual in writing, by providing a website address, or providing a quick response code. The notification forms must contain language, approved by the attorney general, informing an individual charged with a traffic violation, other than offenses listed in section 39-06.1-05, of the procedures available to that individual under sections 39-06.1-02 and 39-06.1-03. The notification must contain a schedule of points to be charged against an individual’s driving record or other operator’s license penalties as provided by law and a schedule of statutory fees and bond amounts as determined in accordance with this chapter. A notification form separate from the uniform traffic summons and complaint may be delivered to an individual charged with a violation of subsection 3 of section 39-21-46.

The director shall prepare a temporary operator’s permit under sections 39-20-03.1, 39-20-03.2, and 39-20-04. The temporary operator’s permit must inform the driver of the procedures available under chapter 39-20 and must be issued in accordance with that chapter. The temporary operator’s permit may not be delivered by mail or electronic means unless specifically authorized under chapter 39-20.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 301, § 7; 1975, ch. 339, § 13; 1983, ch. 415, § 14; 2001, ch. 341, § 3; 2013, ch. 295, § 7; 2021, ch. 291, § 2, effective August 1, 2021.

39-06.1-08.
Nonmoving violation defined.

For the purposes of section 39-06.1-06, a “nonmoving violation” means:

A violation of section 39-04-02.1, subsection 6 of section 39-04-37, subsection 4 of section 39-06-17, and section 39-06-20, 39-06-44, 39-06-45, 39-10-47, 39-10-49, 39-10-50, 39-10-54.1, 39-21-08, 39-21-10, 39-21-11, or 39-21-14, or a violation of any municipal ordinance equivalent to the foregoing sections.

A violation, discovered at a time when the vehicle is not actually being operated, of section 39-21-03, 39-21-05, 39-21-13, 39-21-19, 39-21-32, 39-21-37, 39-21-39, or 39-21-44.2, or a violation of any municipal ordinance equivalent to the foregoing sections.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 301, § 8; 1999, ch. 341, § 4; 2011, ch. 268, § 4; 2013, ch. 291, § 57; 2019, ch. 318, § 1, effective August 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 283, § 7, effective August 1, 2021.

39-06.1-09.
Moving violation defined.

For the purposes of sections 39-06.1-06 and 39-06.1-13, a “moving violation” means a violation of section 39-04-11, 39-04-22, subsection 1 of section 39-04-37, section 39-04-55, 39-06-01, 39-06-04, 39-06-14, 39-06-14.1, 39-06-16, 39-06.2-07, 39-08-20, 39-08-23, 39-08-24, 39-08-25, 39-09-01, 39-09-01.1, 39-09-04.1, or 39-09-09, subsection 1 of section 39-12-02, section 39-12-04, 39-12-05, 39-12-06, 39-12-09, 39-19-03, 39-21-45.1, 39-24-02, or 39-24-09, except subdivisions b and c of subsection 5 of section 39-24-09, or equivalent ordinances; or a violation of the provisions of chapter 39-10, 39-10.2, 39-21, or 39-27, or equivalent ordinances, except subsection 5 of section 39-10-26, section 39-21-44, and subsections 2 and 3 of section 39-21-46, and those sections within those chapters which are specifically listed in subsection 1 of section 39-06.1-08.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 301, § 9; 1977, ch. 355, § 1; 1979, ch. 187, § 77; 1979, ch. 418, § 2; 1979, ch. 419, § 2; 1981, ch. 389, § 2; 1981, ch. 392, § 1; 1985, ch. 433, § 1; 1987, ch. 464, § 1; 1987, ch. 465, § 1; 1987, ch. 466, § 1; 1989, ch. 463, § 2; 2001, ch. 341, § 4; 2003, ch. 318, § 2; 2003, ch. 319, § 2; 2005, ch. 331, § 2; 2009, ch. 331, § 2; 2011, ch. 279, § 2; 2011, ch. 272, § 5; 2013, ch. 291, § 58; 2013, ch. 295, § 8; 2013, ch. 296, § 2; 2015, ch. 264, § 2, effective August 1, 2015; 2017, ch. 269, § 2, effective August 1, 2017; 2021, ch. 280, § 3, effective August 1, 2021; 2021, ch. 283, § 8, effective August 1, 2021.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 2 of chapter 264, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

Note.

Section 39-06.1-09 was amended 2 times by the 2021 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 8 of Chapter 283, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 1502; and Section 3 of Chapter 280, Session Laws 2021, Senate Bill 2097.